apertium-cat-srd.srd.dix
    <pardef n="p/ònnere__vblex" c="p.42">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>onner</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>ònnere</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ònnere</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantare"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>onendi</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e r="LR"><p><l>onendi</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>onende</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>onende</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l>òngio</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ones</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>onet</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>onimus</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>onides</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>onent</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>onia</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>onias</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>oniat</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>oniamus</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>oniais</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>onaiant</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>òngia</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>òngias</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ongiat</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>òngiat</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>ongiamus</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ongiais</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ongiant</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>onnere</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>onneres</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>onneret</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>onneremus</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>onnereis</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>onnerent</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>òne</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ongiat</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ongiamus</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>onide</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>òngiant</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ostu</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>osta</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ostos</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ostas</l><r>ònnere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="pònnere"><i>p</i><par n="p/ònnere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="impònnere"><i>imp</i><par n="p/ònnere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="propònnere"><i>prop</i><par n="p/ònnere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cumpònnere"><i>cump</i><par n="p/ònnere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rispònnere"><i>risp</i><par n="p/ònnere__vblex"/></e>
